California, session 20252026, AB815.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11580.27 is added to the Insurance Code, to read:11580.27. (a) For purposes of insurance, a motor vehicle insured pursuant to a policy of insurance issued under Section 11580.1 or 11580.2 shall not be classified as a common carrier, commercial vehicle, for-hire vehicle, permissive use vehicle, or livery solely for the reason that the named insured is operating or using the insured motor vehicle to provide public social services, as defined in Section 10051 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or social service transportation, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 11580.1.(b) This section does not impair, affect, or change the rights, duties, or obligations of the employer of the named insured.